North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 2. Reports.

§ 55-16-20.
Financial statements for shareholders.

Upon the written request of a shareholder, a corporation shall deliver, or make available to the requesting shareholder by posting on its website or by other generally recognized means, annual financial statements for the most recent fiscal year of the corporation for which annual financial statements have been prepared for the corporation. If financial statements have been prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles for the specified period, the corporation shall deliver or make available those financial statements to the requesting shareholder. If the annual financial statements to be delivered or made available to the requesting shareholder are audited or otherwise reported upon by a public accountant, the report shall also be delivered or made available to the requesting shareholder.

A corporation shall deliver, or make available and provide written notice of availability of, the financial statements required under subsection (a) of this section to the requesting shareholder within five business days of delivery of the written request to the corporation.

A corporation may fulfill its responsibilities under this section by delivering the specified financial statements, or otherwise making them available, in any manner permitted by the applicable regulations of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the following apply:

As a condition to delivering or making available financial statements to a requesting shareholder, the corporation may require the requesting shareholder to agree to reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, and distribution of the financial statements.

The corporation may, if it reasonably determines that the shareholder’s request is not made in good faith or for a proper purpose, decline to deliver or make available the financial statements to that shareholder.

If a corporation does not respond to a shareholder’s request for annual financial statements pursuant to this section in accordance with subsection (b) of this section within five business days of delivery of the request to the corporation, the following apply:

The requesting shareholder may apply to the superior court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or if none in this State, its registered office, is located for an order requiring delivery of or access to the requested financial statements. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders delivery or access to the requested financial statements, it may impose reasonable restrictions on their confidentiality, use, or distribution.

In a proceeding under this subsection, if the corporation has declined to deliver or make available the financial statements because the shareholder had been unwilling to agree to restrictions proposed by the corporation on the confidentiality, use, and distribution of the financial statements, the corporation has the burden of demonstrating that the restrictions proposed by the corporation were reasonable.

In a proceeding under this subsection, if the corporation has declined to deliver or make available the financial statements pursuant to subdivision (d)(2) of this section, the corporation has the burden of demonstrating that it had reasonably determined that the shareholder’s request was not made in good faith or for a proper purpose.

If the court orders delivery or access to the requested financial statements, it shall order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred to obtain the court order, unless the corporation establishes that it had refused delivery or access to the requested financial statements because the shareholder had refused to agree to reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, or distribution of the financial statements or that the corporation had reasonably determined that the shareholder’s request was not made in good faith or for a proper purpose.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 38, 45, 49; Rev., ss. 1179-1181; C.S., ss. 1170, 1172; G.S., ss. 55-107, 55-109; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1965, c. 609; 1973, c. 469, s. 11; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2021-106, s. 6(f).

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Section 16.20(a)

Section 16.20(d)

Section 16.20(e)

Although section 16.20 requires a corporation, upon the written request of a shareholder, to deliver or make available annual financial statements that have been prepared, it does not require a corporation to prepare financial statements. This recognizes that many small, closely held corporations do not regularly prepare formal financial statements unless required by banks, suppliers or other third parties.

Section 16.20 does not limit the financial statements to be delivered or made available to shareholders to financial statements prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles. Many small corporations have never prepared financial statements on the basis of GAAP. “Cash basis” financial statements (often used in preparing the tax returns of small corporations) do not comply with GAAP. Smaller corporations that keep accrual basis records, and file their federal income tax returns on that basis, frequently do not make the adjustments that may be required to present their financial statements on a GAAP basis. Internally or externally prepared financial statements prepared on the basis of other accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances, including tax returns filed with the U.S. Internal Revenue Service (if that is all that is prepared), will suffice for these types of corporations and they may satisfy their obligations under section 16.20 by delivering or making available the requested financial statements in whatever form that they have been prepared for other purposes. If a corporation does prepare financial statements on a GAAP basis for any purpose for the particular year, however, it must send or make available those statements to the requesting shareholder as provided by section 16.20(a).

The last sentence of section 16.20(a) requires that if the financial statements to be delivered or made available have been reported upon by a public accountant, that report must be furnished. Section 16.20(a) refers to a “public accountant.” The same terminology is used in section 8.30 (standards of conduct for directors). In various states different terms are employed to identify those persons who are permitted under the state licensing requirements to act as professional accountants. Phrases like “independent public accountant,” “certified public accountant,” “public accountant,” and others may be used. In adopting the term “public accountant,” the Act uses the words in a general sense to refer to any class or classes of persons who, under the applicable requirements of a particular jurisdiction, are professionally entitled to practice accountancy.

Failure to comply with the requirements of section 16.20 does not adversely affect the existence or good standing of the corporation. Rather, failure to comply gives an aggrieved shareholder rights to compel compliance or to obtain damages, if they can be established, under general principles of law.

A shareholder may also seek access to the financial statements of the corporation through the inspection rights established in section 16.02.

In establishing restrictions with respect to confidentiality, use or distribution that are reasonable under the circumstances, a corporation may consider a number of factors, including the potential competitive harm to the corporation and its other shareholders that could result if the confidential financial information were used to compete with the corporation or disclosed to third parties such as competitors. As provided in section 16.20(d)(2), a corporation may withhold delivery or making available its financial statements to a requesting shareholder if it reasonably determines that the shareholder’s request is not made in good faith and for a proper purpose.

If a corporation fails to comply with section 16.20(b) in a timely manner the judicial remedy of 16.20(e) directs the court to handle the proceeding on an expedited basis to discourage dilatory tactics to avoid or delay delivery or access to financial statements, but does not require the court to resolve these issues on a summary basis. Section 16.20(e), like section 16.04, establishes a sanction against unreasonable delay or refusal to deliver or provide access to financial statements by imposing on the corporation the shareholder’s expenses in obtaining the court’s order unless the corporation can establish that the shareholder had been unwilling to agree to reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use or distribution of the requested financial statements or the corporation had reasonably determined that the shareholder’s request was not made in good faith or for a proper purpose.

Revised North Carolina Commentary 2021

Prior to the 2021 amendments,

G.S. 55-16-20

required corporations to provide shareholders with annual financial statements that included a balance sheet, income statement, a statement of cash flows, and, if financial statements are regularly prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”), the annual financial statements were also required to be prepared on a GAAP basis. Annual financial statements that were reported on by a public accountant were also required to include the accountant’s report, and annual financial statements not reported on by a public accountant were required to include a statement of the president (or other person responsible for accounting records) (1) stating the person’s reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on a GAAP basis, and if not, the basis of preparation and (2) describing any respects in which the statements were prepared on a basis inconsistent with the prior year’s annual financial statements. Prior to the 2021 amendments,

G.S. 55-16-20

(d) required the corporation to mail the annual financial statements to each shareholder, or provide written notice that the financial statements are available, within one hundred twenty (120) days after the close of each fiscal year (although the failure to do so may not serve as the basis for a claim for damages by a shareholder, unless the failure was in bad faith).

Complying with these extensive requirements imposed a substantial time and resource burden on closely held, small and mid-sized corporations. In recognition of this burden, the Model Act was amended in 2016 to (1) remove the requirement that a corporation regularly prepare financial statements for delivery to shareholders (while retaining a requirement that financial statements be made available on request, as further described below) and (2) eliminate the statutorily-imposed standards for preparation of financial statements. Beyond the reduced burden on corporations, these changes are an acknowledgment that the nature and complexity of a corporation’s business (including the requirements of third parties, like banks, suppliers and taxing authorities) should be the primary driver of the form and presentation of the corporation’s financial statements, rather than a corporate statute.

The 2021 revisions to

G.S. 55-16-20

reflect this same approach. Specifically, in lieu of a requirement that the corporation maintain and mail financial statements on an annual basis, the changes to

G.S. 55-16-20

(a) and (b) require the corporation to make financial statements available within five (5) business days of a qualified shareholder’s request (with flexibility on the method by which they may be made available). Likewise, the changes to G.S. 55-16-20 eliminate the statutory standards for preparation of the financial statements, and the required presidential (or other) statement about the basis of preparation if financial statements are non-GAAP. This approach allows the corporation to determine the form and basis of its financial statements in light of the size, nature and needs of its business, while ensuring that qualified shareholders retain rights of access to key financial information to allow them to monitor and evaluate their investment.

§ 55-16-21.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-268, s. 37, effective October 1, 2005.

§ 55-16-22.
Annual report.

Requirement. — Except as provided in subsections (a1) and (a2) of this section, each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State shall deliver an annual report directly to the Secretary of State in electronic form or in paper form as prescribed by the Secretary of State under this section.

(a1)

Insurers. —

Each insurance company subject to the provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes shall deliver an annual report to the Secretary of State.

(a2)

Professional Corporations Exempt. —

A corporation governed by Chapter 55B of the General Statutes is exempt from this section.

(a3)

Form; Required Information. —

The annual report required by this section shall be in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall prescribe the form needed to file an annual report electronically and shall provide this form by electronic means. The annual report shall set forth all of the following:

The name of the corporation and the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the registered office, the county in which its registered office is located, and the name of its registered agent at that office in this State, and a statement of any change of such registered office or registered agent, or both.

The address and telephone number of its principal office.

The names, titles, and business addresses of its principal officers.

(4a)

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-475, s. 6.1, effective January 1, 1998.

A brief description of the nature of its business.

If the information contained in the most recently filed annual report has not changed, a certification to that effect may be made instead of setting forth the information required by subdivisions (2) through (5) of this subsection.

(a4)

Form; Certain Veteran-Owned Businesses. —

The Secretary of State shall also provide appropriate space and instructions on the annual report form for a domestic corporation or foreign corporation to voluntarily indicate whether or not the corporation is a veteran-owned small business or a service-disabled veteran-owned small business.

Currency of Information. — Information in the annual report must be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the corporation.

Due Date. — An annual report is due by the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the corporation’s fiscal year.

Incomplete Information. — If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly notify the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to contain the information required by this section and submitted to the Secretary of State within 30 days after the effective date of notice, it is deemed to be timely filed.

Amendments. — Amendments to any previously filed annual report may be filed with the Secretary of State at any time for the purpose of correcting, updating, or augmenting the information contained in the annual report.

Expired.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-204, s. 1.13, effective August 11, 2017.

Delinquency. — If the Secretary of State does not receive an annual report within 60 days of the date the report is due, the Secretary of State may presume that the annual report is delinquent. This presumption may be rebutted by evidence of delivery presented by the filing corporation.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 32(a); 1993, c. 218, s. 2; 1997-475, s. 6.1; 2003-233, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 31.4(a); 2017-90, s. 1(b); 2017-204, s. 1.13; 2019-177, s. 5.

§ 55-16-22.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-228, s. 17, effective December 1, 1999.

§ 55-16-22.2.
Report of veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses.

Using the information reported pursuant to G.S. 55-16-22(a4), the Secretary of State shall compile summary information on an aggregate basis about the number of veteran-owned small businesses and the number of service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses reporting in this State. The Secretary of State shall annually report this summary information to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs by March 1 of each year.

History.

2017-90, s. 1(c).